California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
In any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 32431, the court may, with the consent of the Attorney General, order a change in the place of trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

32432.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if the board finds that neither the person liable for payment of tax nor any party related to that person has in any way caused an erroneous refund for which an action for recovery is provided under Section 32431, no interest shall be imposed on the amount of that erroneous refund until 30 days after the date on which the board serves a notice of determination for repayment of the erroneous refund to the person. The act of filing a claim for refund shall not be considered as causing the erroneous refund.

(b) This section shall be operative for any action for recovery under Section 32431 on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 53.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

32433.

The Attorney General shall prosecute any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 32431, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proof, trials, and appeals shall apply to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cancellations [32440. - 32440.]

32440.

If any amount has been illegally determined, either by the person filing the return or by the board, the board shall certify the amount determined to be in excess of the amount legally due and the person against whom the determination was made, and shall authorize the cancellation of the amount upon the records of the board. Any cancellation by the board pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 10.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Administration [32451. - 32476.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [32451. - 32458.4.]

32451.

The board shall enforce the provisions of this part and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32452.

(a) In addition to any other reports or schedules required under this part, the board may, by rule and otherwise, require additional, other, or supplemental reports or schedules from alcoholic beverage licensees, common and private carriers, and other persons and prescribe the form, including verification, of the information to be given on, and the times for filing of, such additional, other, or supplemental reports or schedules.

(b) Any reports or schedules required to be filed under this section shall be filed using electronic media. Reports shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(c) The failure or refusal of
 any person to render the reports required under this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 54.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

32452.1.

For all purposes of this part, when records are maintained in liters the equivalent measure in wine gallons shall be determined by multiplying total liters by a conversion factor of 0.26417 for wine, and by a conversion factor of 0.264172 for distilled spirits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 921.)
-------------------------------------------

32453.

The board may make such examinations of the books and records of any person selling, manufacturing, warehousing, or transporting alcoholic beverages as it may deem necessary in carrying out the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32454.

The board may employ accountants, auditors, investigators and other expert and clerical assistance necessary to enforce its powers and perform its duties under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32455.

It is unlawful for the board or any person having an administrative position under this part to make known in any manner whatever any information set forth or disclosed in any report from any winegrower pursuant to this part regarding the names of the purchasers and the amounts of individual sales of wines which the winegrower has exported from this state, or to permit the portion of any report or copy thereof which contains such information to be seen or examined by any person. This section does not prohibit the publication by the board of any winegrower’s total receipts from the export of wines from this state.

Nothing in this
 section shall prevent the board from exchanging with officials of other states information concerning the interstate shipments of wine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 208.)
-------------------------------------------

32455.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who is engaged in the business of preparing, or providing services in connection with the preparation of, returns under Chapter 6 of this part, or any person who for compensation prepares any such return for any other person, and who knowingly or recklessly does either of the following, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned no more than one year, or both, together with the costs of
 prosecution:

(1) Discloses any information furnished to him or her for, or in connection with, the preparation of the return.

(2) Uses that information for any purpose other than to prepare, or assist in preparing, the return.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to disclosure of information if that disclosure is made pursuant to the person’s consent or pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other compulsory legal process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

32456.

A certificate by the board or an employee of the board stating that a notice required by this part was given by mailing or personal service shall be prima facie evidence in any administrative or judicial proceeding of the fact and regularity of the mailing or personal service in accordance with any requirement of this part for the giving of a notice. Unless otherwise specifically required, any notice provided by this part to be mailed or served may be given either by mailing or by personal service in the manner provided for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 610.)
-------------------------------------------

32457.

Notwithstanding Section 15619 of the Government Code, all information contained in the Vendor’s Report of Beer Shipments into California may be made public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

32457.1.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), and notwithstanding Section 15619 of the Government Code, any information contained in the returns and accompanying schedules of a winegrower, filed on or after January 1, 2023, shall be made public upon request, including the names and addresses of all taxpayers filing a winegrower return.

(b) It is unlawful for the board or any other person having an administrative duty under this part to disclose any of the following:

(1) The names and addresses of any taxpayer that is a natural person.

(2) Any information subject to a prohibition against disclosure pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) (1) A taxpayer may elect to prohibit the disclosure of any information contained in that taxpayer’s winegrower return and accompanying schedules. The board shall amend the winegrower return form to include a designated line or checkbox wherein the taxpayer may elect to prohibit disclosure of the information.

(2) The board shall amend the winegrower return form to include information describing how the wine industry has historically used data in winegrower returns for market analysis and an explanation of the taxpayer’s right to elect to prohibit disclosure of information. This shall be conspicuously displayed within the electronic return form in a manner that allows it to be reviewed by the taxpayer prior to making the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 702, Sec. 3.   (SB 518)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32457.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), and notwithstanding Section 15619 of the Government Code, any information contained in the returns and accompanying schedules of a beer manufacturer, filed on or after January 1, 2024, shall be made public upon request, including the names and addresses of all taxpayers filing a beer manufacturer return.

(b) It is unlawful for the board or any other person having an administrative duty under this part to disclose any of the following:

(1) The names and addresses of any taxpayer that is a natural person.

(2) Any information subject to a prohibition against disclosure pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) (1) A taxpayer may elect to prohibit the disclosure of any information contained in that taxpayer’s beer manufacturer return and accompanying schedules. The board shall amend the beer manufacturer return form to include a designated line or checkbox wherein the taxpayer may elect to prohibit disclosure of the information.

(2) The board shall amend the beer manufacturer return form to include information describing how the beer industry has historically used data in beer manufacturer returns for market analysis and an explanation of the taxpayer’s right to elect to prohibit
 disclosure of information. This shall be conspicuously displayed within the electronic return form in a manner that allows it to be reviewed by the taxpayer prior to making the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 214, Sec. 1.   (SB 388)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

32458.

(a) The board shall determine which taxpayer’s accounts are eligible for the managed audit program in a manner that is consistent with the efficient use of its auditing resources and the maximum effectiveness of the program.

(b) A taxpayer is not required to participate in the managed audit program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 16.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

32458.1.

A taxpayer’s account is eligible for the managed audit program only if the taxpayer meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The taxpayer’s business involves few or no statutory exemptions.

(b) The taxpayer’s business involves a single or a small number of clearly defined taxability issues.

(c) The taxpayer is taxed pursuant to this part and agrees to participate in the managed audit program.

(d) The taxpayer has the resources to comply with the managed audit instructions provided by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 17.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

32458.2.

(a) If the board selects a taxpayer’s account for a managed audit, all of the following apply:

(1) The board shall identify all of the following:

(A) The audit period covered by the managed audit.

(B) The types of transactions covered by the managed audit.

(C) The specific procedures that the taxpayer is to follow in determining any liability.

(D) The records to be reviewed by the taxpayer.

(E) The manner in which the types of transactions are to be scheduled for review.

(F) The time period for completion of the managed audit.

(G) The time period for the payment of the liability and interest.

(H) Any other criteria that the board may require for completion of the managed audit.

(2) The taxpayer shall:

(A) Examine its books and records to determine if it
 has any unreported tax liability for the audit period.

(B) Make available to the board for verification all computations and books and records examined pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(b) The information provided by the taxpayer pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is the same information that is required for the completion of any other audit that the board may conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 18.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

32458.3.

Nothing in this article limits the board’s authority to examine the books and records of a taxpayer under Section 32453.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 19.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

32458.4.

Upon completion of the managed audit and verification by the board, interest on any unpaid liability shall be computed at one-half the rate that would otherwise be imposed for liabilities covered by the audit period. Payment of the liabilities and interest shall be made within the time period specified by the board. If the requirements for the managed audit are not satisfied, the board may proceed to examine the records of the taxpayer in a manner to be determined by the board
 under law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 20.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The California Taxpayers’ Bill of Rights [32460. - 32476.]

32460.

The board shall administer this article. Unless the context indicates otherwise, the provisions of this article shall apply to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32461.

(a) The board shall establish the position of the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate. The advocate or his or her designee shall be responsible for facilitating resolution of taxpayer complaints and problems, including any taxpayer complaints regarding unsatisfactory treatment of taxpayers by board employees, and staying actions where taxpayers have suffered or will suffer irreparable loss as the result of those actions. Applicable statutes of limitation shall be tolled during the pendency of a stay. Any penalties and interest that would otherwise
 accrue shall not be affected by the granting of a stay.

(b) The advocate shall report directly to the executive officer of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32462.

(a) The board shall develop and implement an education and information program directed at, but not limited to, all of the following groups:

(1) Taxpayers newly registered with the board.

(2) Board audit and compliance staff.

(b) The education and information program shall include all of the following:

(1) A program of written communication with newly registered taxpayers explaining in simplified terms their duties and responsibilities.

(2) Participation in seminars and similar programs organized by federal, state, and local agencies.

(3) Revision of taxpayer educational materials currently produced by the board that explain the most common areas of taxpayer nonconformance in simplified terms.

(4) Implementation of a continuing education program for audit and compliance personnel to include the application of new legislation to taxpayer activities and areas of recurrent taxpayer noncompliance or inconsistency of administration.

(c) Electronic media used pursuant to this section shall not
 represent the voice, picture, or name of members of the board or of the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

32463.

The board shall conduct an annual hearing before the full board where industry representatives and individual taxpayers are allowed to present their proposals on changes to the Alcoholic Beverage Tax Law which may further improve voluntary compliance and the relationship between taxpayers and government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32464.

The board shall prepare and publish brief but comprehensive statements in simple and nontechnical language that explain procedures, remedies, and the rights and obligations of the board and taxpayers. As appropriate, statements shall be provided to taxpayers with the initial notice of audit, the notice of proposed additional taxes, any subsequent notice of tax due, or other substantive notices. Additionally, the board shall include this language for statements in the annual tax information bulletins that are mailed to taxpayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32465.

(a) The total amount of revenue collected or assessed pursuant to this part shall not be used for any of the following:

(1) To evaluate individual officers or employees.

(2) To impose or suggest production quotas or goals, other than quotas or goals with respect to accounts receivable.

(b) The board shall certify in its annual report submitted
 pursuant to Section 15616 of the Government Code that revenue collected or assessed is not used in a manner prohibited by subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the setting of goals and the evaluation of performance with respect to productivity and the efficient use of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32466.

The board shall develop and implement a program that will evaluate an individual employee’s or officer’s performance with respect to his or her contact with taxpayers. The development and implementation of the program shall be coordinated with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32467.

The board shall, in cooperation with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate, and other interested taxpayer-oriented groups, develop a plan to reduce the time required to resolve petitions for redetermination and claims for refunds. The plan shall include determination of standard timeframes and special review of cases that take more time than the appropriate standard timeframe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32468.

Procedures of the board, relating to appeals staff review conferences before a staff attorney or supervising tax auditor independent of the assessing department, shall include all of the following:

(a) Any conference shall be held at a reasonable time at a board office that is convenient to the taxpayer.

(b) The conference may be recorded only if prior notice is given to the taxpayer and the taxpayer is entitled to receive a copy of
 the recording.

(c) The taxpayer shall be informed prior to any conference that he or she has a right to have present at the conference his or her attorney, accountant, or other designated agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32469.

(a) Every taxpayer is entitled to be reimbursed for any reasonable fees and expenses related to a hearing before the board if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The taxpayer files a claim for the fee and expenses with the board within one year of the date the decision of the board becomes final.

(2) The board, in its sole discretion, finds that the action taken by the board staff was
 unreasonable.

(3) The board decides that the taxpayer be awarded a specific amount of fees and expenses related to the hearing, in an amount determined by the board in its sole discretion.

(b) To determine whether the board staff has been unreasonable, the board shall consider whether the board staff has established that its position was substantially justified.

(c) The amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to the following:

(1) Fees and expenses incurred after the date of the notice of determination, jeopardy determination, or a claim for refund.

(2) If the board finds that the staff was unreasonable with respect to certain issues but reasonable with respect to other
 issues, the amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to those that relate to the issues where the staff was unreasonable.

(d) Any proposed award by the board pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the award.

(e) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for claims filed on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

32470.

(a) An officer or employee of the board acting in connection with any law administered by the board shall not knowingly authorize, require, or conduct any investigation of, or surveillance over, any person for nontax administration related purposes.

(b) Any person violating subdivision (a) shall be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, including dismissal from office or discharge from employment.

(c) This section shall not apply with respect to any otherwise lawful investigation concerning organized crime activities.

(d) The provisions of this section are not intended to prohibit, restrict, or prevent the exchange of information where the person is being investigated for multiple violations which include alcoholic beverage tax violations.

(e) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Investigation” means any oral or written inquiry directed to any person, organization, or governmental agency.

(2) “Surveillance” means the monitoring of persons, places, or events by means of electronic interception, overt or covert observations, or photography, and the use of informants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32471.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Board of Equalization, its staff, and the Attorney General pursue settlements as authorized under this section with respect to civil tax matters in dispute that are the subject of protests, appeals, or refund claims, consistent with a reasonable evaluation of the costs and risks associated with litigation of these matters.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) and subject to paragraph (2),
 the executive director or chief counsel, if authorized by the executive director, of the board may recommend to the State Board of Equalization, itself, a settlement of any civil tax matter in dispute.

(2) No recommendation of settlement shall be submitted to the board, itself, unless and until that recommendation has been submitted by the executive director or chief counsel to the Attorney General. Within 30 days of receiving that recommendation, the Attorney General shall review the recommendation and advise, in writing, the executive director or chief counsel of the board of his or her conclusions as to whether the recommendation is reasonable from an overall perspective. The executive director or chief counsel shall, with each recommendation of settlement submitted to the board, itself, also submit the Attorney General’s written conclusions obtained pursuant to this paragraph.

(3) A settlement of any civil tax matter in dispute involving a reduction of tax or penalties in settlement, the total of which reduction of tax and penalties in settlement does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), may be approved by the executive director and chief counsel, jointly. The executive director shall notify the board, itself, of any settlement approved pursuant to this paragraph.

(c) Whenever a reduction of tax, or penalties, or total tax and penalties in settlement in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved pursuant to this section, there shall be placed on file, for at least one year, in the office of the executive director of the board a public record with respect to that settlement. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name or names of the taxpayers who are parties to the settlement.

(2) The total amount in dispute.

(3) The amount agreed to pursuant to the settlement.

(4) A summary of the reasons why the settlement is in the best interests of the State of California.

(5) For any settlement approved by the board, itself, the Attorney General’s conclusion as to whether the recommendation of settlement was reasonable from an overall perspective.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secret, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure that, if disclosed, would adversely affect the taxpayer or the national defense.

(d) The members of the State Board of
 Equalization shall not participate in the settlement of tax matters pursuant to this section, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) (1) Any recommendation for settlement shall be approved or disapproved by the board, itself, within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation to the board. Any recommendation for settlement that is not either approved or disapproved by the board, itself, within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation shall be deemed approved. Upon approval of a recommendation for settlement, the matter shall be referred back to the executive director or chief counsel in accordance with the decision of the board.

(2) Disapproval of a recommendation for settlement shall be made only by a majority vote of the board. Where the board disapproves a recommendation for settlement, the matter shall be remanded to board staff for
 further negotiation, and may be resubmitted to the board, in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as the initial submission, at the discretion of the executive director or chief counsel.

(f) All settlements entered into pursuant to this section shall be final and nonappealable, except upon a showing of fraud or misrepresentation with respect to a material fact.

(g) Any proceedings undertaken by the board itself pursuant to a settlement as described in this section shall be conducted in a closed session or sessions. Except as provided in subdivision (c), any settlement considered or entered into pursuant to this section shall constitute confidential tax information for purposes of Section 32455.

(h) This section shall apply only to civil tax matters in dispute on or after the effective date of the act
 adding this subdivision.

(i) The Legislature finds that it is essential for fiscal purposes that the settlement program authorized by this section be expeditiously implemented. Accordingly, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the board in implementing and administering the settlement program authorized by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

32471.5.

(a) The executive director and chief counsel of the board, or their delegates, may compromise any final tax liability pursuant to this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Board” means the State Board of Equalization or its delegates.

(2) “Delegates” includes the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

 (3) “A final tax liability” means any final tax liability arising under Part 14 (commencing with Section 32001), or related interest, additions to tax, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part.

(c) (1) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated by a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the taxpayer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued business.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a qualified final tax liability may be compromised regardless of whether the business has been discontinued or transferred or whether the taxpayer has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued business. All other provisions of this section that apply to a final tax liability shall also apply to a qualified final tax liability, and a compromise shall not be made under this subdivision
 unless all other requirements of this section are met. For purposes of this subdivision, a “qualified final tax liability” means that part of a final tax liability, including related interest, additions to tax, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part, arising from a transaction or transactions in which the board finds no evidence that the taxpayer collected reimbursement or tax reimbursement from the purchaser or other person and which was determined against the taxpayer under Article 2 (commencing with Section 32271), Article 3 (commencing with Section 32291), or Article 4 (commencing with Section 32301) of Chapter 6.

(3) A qualified final tax liability may not be compromised with any of the following:

(A) A taxpayer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) for a liability, or a part thereof, arising from a transaction or transactions that are
 substantially similar to the transaction or transactions attributable to the liability for which the taxpayer is making the offer.

(B) A business that was transferred by a taxpayer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) and who has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business, when the liability for which the offer is made is attributable to a transaction or transactions substantially similar to the transaction or transactions for which the taxpayer’s liability was previously compromised.

(C) A business in which a taxpayer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business for which the taxpayer received the compromise, when the liability of the business making the offer arose from a transaction or transactions substantially similar to the transaction or
 transactions for which the taxpayer’s liability was previously compromised.

(d) The board may, in its discretion, enter into a written agreement which permits the taxpayer to pay the compromise in installments for a period not exceeding one year. The agreement may provide that such installments shall be paid by electronic funds transfers or any other means to facilitate the payment of each installment.

(e) The members of the State Board of Equalization shall not participate in any offer in compromise matters pursuant to this section.

(f) A taxpayer that has received a compromise under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) may be required to enter into any collateral agreement that is deemed necessary for the protection of the interests of the state. A collateral agreement may include a provision that allows the board to
 reestablish the liability, or any portion thereof, if the taxpayer has sufficient annual income during the succeeding five-year period. The board shall establish criteria for determining “sufficient annual income” for purposes of this subdivision.

(g) A taxpayer that has received a compromise under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall file and pay by the due date all subsequently required tax returns and reports for a five-year period from the date the liability is compromised, or until the taxpayer is no longer required to file tax returns and reports, whichever period is earlier.

(h) Offers in compromise shall not be considered where the taxpayer has been convicted of felony tax evasion under this part during the liability period.

(i) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions
 shall exist:

(1) The taxpayer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the taxpayer’s present assets or income.

(B) The taxpayer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the taxpayer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The board shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(j) A determination by the board that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final tax liability shall not
 be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(k) (1) Offers for liabilities with a fraud or evasion penalty shall require a minimum offer of the unpaid tax and fraud or evasion penalty.

(2) The minimum offer may be waived if it can be shown that the taxpayer making the offer was not the person responsible for perpetrating the fraud or evasion. This authorization to waive only applies to partnership accounts where the intent to commit fraud or evasion can be clearly attributed to a partner of the taxpayer.

(l) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the board shall notify the taxpayer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or
 refunded, at the discretion of the taxpayer.

(m) When more than one taxpayer is liable for the debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, including, but not limited to, taxpayers who are liable through dual determination or successor’s liability, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable taxpayer shall reduce the amount of the liability of the other taxpayers by the amount of the accepted offer.

(n) Whenever a compromise of tax or penalties or total tax and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the board a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the taxpayer.

(2) The amount of unpaid tax and related penalties, additions to tax, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the taxpayer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Section 32455. A list shall not be prepared and releases shall not be distributed by the board in connection with these statements.

(o) A compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be
 reestablished, without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable, and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The board determines that a person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the board property belonging to the estate of a taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified a book, document, or record or made a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(2) The taxpayer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(p) A person who, in connection with an offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from an officer or employee of this state property belonging to the estate of a taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(q) For
 purposes of this section, “person” means the taxpayer, a member of the taxpayer’s family, a corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or another individual or entity acting on behalf of, the taxpayer, or another corporation or entity owned or controlled by the taxpayer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the taxpayer, directly or indirectly.

(r) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 272, Sec. 7) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 38.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 39 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 474.)
-------------------------------------------

32471.5.

(a) The executive director and chief counsel of the board, or their delegates, may compromise any final tax liability pursuant to this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Board” means the State Board of Equalization or its delegates.

(2) “Delegates” includes the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(3) “A final tax liability” means any final tax liability arising under Part 14 (commencing with Section 32001), or related interest, additions to tax, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part.

(c) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated by a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the taxpayer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued business.

(d) Offers in compromise shall not be considered where the taxpayer has been convicted of felony tax evasion under this part during the liability period.

(e) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The taxpayer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment
 is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the taxpayer’s present assets or income.

(B) The taxpayer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the taxpayer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The board shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.
